Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.142.030

Bonds, notes, evidences of indebtedness—University of Washington—Refinancing.

The board of regents of the University of Washington may issue bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness under this section for the purpose of refinancing real and personal property acquired by the University of Washington during the period between August and October 2006. The board of regents of the University of Washington may obligate all or a component of the fees and revenues of the university for the payment of such bonds, notes, or evidences of indebtedness: PROVIDED, That such fees and revenues are not subject to appropriation by the legislature and do not constitute general state revenues as defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution. Bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued under this section shall be issued in accordance with the procedures in RCW 28B.10.310 and 28B.10.315 or the provisions applicable to either the state or local governments under chapter 39.46 or 39.53 RCW. Such bonds, notes, and other indebtedness shall not constitute bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness secured by the full faith and credit of the state or required to be paid, directly or indirectly, from general state revenues.

[ 2009 c 500 s 5; 2007 c 24 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 500: See note following RCW 39.42.070.

Effective date—2007 c 24 s 4: "Section 4 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect May 1, 2007." [ 2007 c 24 s 6.]